Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2564.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-3214, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-3214. Board actions; public access to records; website; exception A. If a health profession regulatory board dismisses a complaint, the record of that complaint is available to that health profession regulatory board and the public pursuant to section 39-121 but may not appear on the Health profession regulatory board's website. For the purposes of this subsection, "dismisses a complaint" means that a health profession regulatory board does not issue a disciplinary or nondisciplinary order or action against a licensee or certificate holder. A pending complaint or investigation may not be disclosed to the public. B. All disciplinary actions against a licensee or certificate holder shall be available on the health profession regulatory board's website for not more than five years.  If a health profession regulatory board issues a final nondisciplinary order or action, the record of the final nondisciplinary order or action shall be made available on the health profession regulatory board's website for not more than five years. Letters of concern and advisory letters may not be made available on the website but a copy of such letters are available to the public pursuant to section 39-121 and shall be provided to any person on request. C. If a health profession regulatory board maintains a website, the health profession regulatory board must display on its website a statement that a person may obtain additional public records related to any licensee or certificate holder, including dismissed complaints and nondisciplinary actions and orders, by contacting the health profession regulatory board directly. D. This section does not prohibit a health profession regulatory board from conducting its authorized duties in a public meeting. E. Subsections A and B of this section do not apply to meeting minutes and notices kept by the health profession regulatory board in accordance with the public meeting requirements of title 38, chapter 3, article 3.1. END_STATUTE